Tennessee, session 114, HB1942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-21-303(a)(2), is amended by
inserting the following sentence immediately after the first sentence:
For purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), "medical condition" includes communication
disorders, including, but not limited to, speech, language, and fluency disorders, such as
stuttering.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1942
010915
- 1 -